Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1177.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 35, chapter 1, article 5, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 35-196.06, to read: START_STATUTE35-196.06. Public monies; gender transition; prohibition; violation; misuse of public monies; definitions A. Notwithstanding any other law, public monies may not be used to fund any medical procedure for the purpose of gender transition. B. Any INTENTIONAL violation of this section by a public officer or public employee is considered a misuse of public monies and a violation of section 35-301. C. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Fund" means to subsidize, reimburse, expend, allocate, grant, pay or distribute public monies directly or indirectly to any person or entity, including for reimbursements and coverage for costs, premiums or charges associated with a health INSURANCE policy, contract or plan provided by the Arizona health care cost containment system. 2. "Gender transition" has the same meaning prescribed in section 32-3230. 3. "Medical procedure" means: (a) Surgically removing, modifying, altering or entering into tissues, cavities or organs of a person. (b) Prescribing, administering or dispensing any puberty blocker, hormone or PHARMACEUTICAL or PRESCRIPTION drug to a person. 4. "Public monies" has the same meaning prescribed in section 35-302. END_STATUTE